Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-436.01
License; designation of services.

A health care facility applying for a license as a mental health substance use treatment center shall designate whether the license is to be issued to provide services for mental health disorders, for substance use disorders, or for both mental health and substance use disorders. A license issued to provide services for mental health disorders permits the facility to treat persons whose primary need is treatment for mental health disorders. A license issued to provide services for substance use disorders permits the facility to treat persons whose primary need is treatment for substance use disorders. A license issued to provide services for both mental health and substance use disorders permits the facility to treat persons with mental health disorders, substance use disorders, or both mental health disorders and substance use disorders.

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 56.
July 19, 2018